lib/dict/cs_CZ.aff
SFX B Y 257
SFX B   e           e¹         e
SFX B   e           u          [^cj]e
SFX B   e           i          ce
SFX B   e           i          je
SFX B   e           eme        e
SFX B   e           ete        e
SFX B   e           ou         [^cj]e
SFX B   ce          tìjí       ce
SFX B   e           í          je
SFX B   ce          tìj        ce
SFX B   ce          tìjme      ce
SFX B   ce          tìjte      ce
SFX B   e           0          [rs]e
SFX B   e           me         [rs]e
SFX B   e           te         [rs]e
SFX B   ¾e          ¾          [^áíl]¾e
SFX B   í¾e         i¾         í¾e
SFX B   á¾e         a¾         á¾e
SFX B   ¾e          ¾i         l¾e
SFX B   èe          è          [^á]èe
SFX B   èe          è          áèe
SFX B   øe          øi         øe
SFX B   ¹e          ¹          [^í]¹e
SFX B   í¹e         i¹         í¹e
SFX B   je          j          je
SFX B   e           i          ve
SFX B   ne          ò          ne
SFX B   te          »          [^s]te
SFX B   de          ï          [ae]de
SFX B   de          di         [^ea]de
SFX B   e           te         [^è¾¹tncdv]e
SFX B   e           me         [^è¾¹tncdv]e
SFX B   ¹e          ¹me        [^í]¹e
SFX B   ¹e          ¹te        [^í]¹e
SFX B   í¹e         i¹me       í¹e
SFX B   í¹e         i¹te       í¹e
SFX B   ¾e          ¾me        [^áíl]¾e
SFX B   ¾e          ¾te        [^áíl]¾e
SFX B   í¾e         i¾me       í¾e
SFX B   í¾e         i¾te       í¾e
SFX B   á¾e         a¾me       á¾e
SFX B   á¾e         a¾te       á¾e
SFX B   0           me         l¾e
SFX B   0           te         l¾e
SFX B   èe          ème        [^á]èe
SFX B   èe          ète        [^á]èe
SFX B   áèe         aème       áèe
SFX B   áèe         aète       áèe
SFX B   de          dìme       [^ea]de
SFX B   de          dìte       [^ea]de
SFX B   de          ïme        [ae]de
SFX B   de          ïte        [ae]de
SFX B   ne          òme        ne
SFX B   ne          òte        ne
SFX B   te          »me        [^s]te
SFX B   te          »te        [^s]te
SFX B   e           ìme        ve
SFX B   e           ìte        ve
SFX B   u           e¹         [^ï»ò]u
SFX B   u           e          [^ï»ò]u
SFX B   u           eme        [^ï»ò]u
SFX B   u           ete        [^ï»ò]u
SFX B   u           ou         u
SFX B   òu          nì¹        òu
SFX B   òu          nì         òu
SFX B   òu          nìme       òu
SFX B   òu          nìte       òu
SFX B   u           i          l¾u
SFX B   u           i          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][^aeiouyáéíóúýùì¾]u
SFX B   u           ìme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][bdfmnptvw]u
SFX B   u           eme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][cèghjklrøs¹z]u
SFX B   u           ìte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][bdfmnptvw]u
SFX B   u           ete        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][cèghjklrøs¹z]u
SFX B   du          ï          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]du
SFX B   du          ïme        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]du
SFX B   du          ïte        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]du
SFX B   nu          ò          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]nu
SFX B   nu          òme        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]nu
SFX B   nu          òte        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]nu
SFX B   tu          »          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]tu
SFX B   tu          »me        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]tu
SFX B   tu          »te        [aeiouyáéíóúýùì]tu
SFX B   u           0          [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][cèghjklrøsz]u
SFX B   u           me         [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][cèghjklrøsz]u
SFX B   u           te         [aeiouyáéíóúýùì][cèghjklrøsz]u
SFX B   í¹u         i¹         í¹u
SFX B   í¹u         i¹me       í¹u
SFX B   í¹u         i¹te       í¹u
SFX B   i           e¹         [^t]i
SFX B   i           e¹         [^t]i
SFX B   i           e          [^t]i
SFX B   i           eme        [^t]i
SFX B   i           ete        [^t]i
SFX B   i           í          [^t]i
SFX B   i           0          ji
SFX B   i           me         ji
SFX B   i           te         ji
SFX B   m           ¹          ím
SFX B   m           0          ím
SFX B   0           e          ím
SFX B   m           te         ím
SFX B   ím          0          ¾ím
SFX B   ím          me         ¾ím
SFX B   ím          te         ¾ím
SFX B   ím          i          [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][^aeiouyáéíóúýùì]ím
SFX B   ím          ìme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][bdfmnptvw]ím
SFX B   ím          eme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][cèghjklrøs¹z]ím
SFX B   ím          ìte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][bdfmnptvw]ím
SFX B   ím          ete        [^aeiouyáéíóúýùì][cèghjklrøs¹z]ím
SFX B   ojím        ùj         ojím
SFX B   ojím        ùjme       ojím
SFX B   ojím        ùjte       ojím
SFX B   0           i          [aáìíuý]t
SFX B   ít          iji        ít
SFX B   ít          ije¹       ít
SFX B   ít          ije        ít
SFX B   ít          ijeme      ít
SFX B   ít          ijete      ít
SFX B   ít          ijí        ít
SFX B   ít          ij         ít
SFX B   ít          ijme       ít
SFX B   ít          ijte       ít
SFX B   ít          il         ít
SFX B   ít          ila        ít
SFX B   ít          ilo        ít
SFX B   ít          ili        ít
SFX B   ít          ily        ít
SFX B   t           ji         ìt
SFX B   t           je¹        ìt
SFX B   t           je         ìt
SFX B   t           jeme       ìt
SFX B   t           jete       ìt
SFX B   t           jí         ìt
SFX B   t           j          ìt
SFX B   t           jme        ìt
SFX B   t           jte        ìt
SFX B   t           ji         et
SFX B   t           je¹        et
SFX B   t           je         et
SFX B   t           jeme       et
SFX B   t           jete       et
SFX B   t           jí         et
SFX B   t           j          et
SFX B   t           jme        et
SFX B   t           jte        et
SFX B   ýt          yji        ýt
SFX B   ýt          yje¹       ýt
SFX B   ýt          yje        ýt
SFX B   ýt          yjeme      ýt
SFX B   ýt          yjete      ýt
SFX B   ýt          yjí        ýt
SFX B   ýt          yj         ýt
SFX B   ýt          yjme       ýt
SFX B   ýt          yjte       ýt
SFX B   ýt          yl         ýt
SFX B   ýt          yla        ýt
SFX B   ýt          ylo        ýt
SFX B   ýt          yli        ýt
SFX B   ýt          yly        ýt
SFX B   át          aji        [^bpvmnød]át
SFX B   át          aje¹       [^bpvmnød]át
SFX B   át          aje        [^bpvmnød]át
SFX B   át          ajeme      [^bpvmnød]át
SFX B   át          ajete      [^bpvmnød]át
SFX B   át          ají        [^bpvmnød]át
SFX B   át          aj         [^bpvmnød]át
SFX B   át          ajme       [^bpvmnød]át
SFX B   át          ajte       [^bpvmnød]át
SFX B   át          ajíc       [^bpvmnød]át
SFX B   át          ajíce      [^bpvmnød]át
SFX B   át          ìji        [bpvmn]át
SFX B   át          ìje¹       [bpvmn]át
SFX B   át          ìje        [bpvmn]át
SFX B   át          ìjeme      [bpvmn]át
SFX B   át          ìjete      [bpvmn]át
SFX B   át          ìjí        [bpvmn]át
SFX B   át          ìj         [bpvmn]át
SFX B   át          ìjme       [bpvmn]át
SFX B   át          ìjte       [bpvmn]át
SFX B   át          ìjíc       [bpvmn]át
SFX B   át          ìjíce      [bpvmn]át
SFX B   0           i          dát
SFX B   t           m          dát
SFX B   t           ¹          dát
SFX B   t           0          dát
SFX B   t           me         dát
SFX B   t           te         dát
SFX B   át          ají        dát
SFX B   át          ej         dát
SFX B   át          ejme       dát
SFX B   át          ejte       dát
SFX B   át          eji        øát
SFX B   át          eje¹       øát
SFX B   át          eje        øát
SFX B   át          ejeme      øát
SFX B   át          ejete      øát
SFX B   át          ejí        øát
SFX B   át          ej         øát
SFX B   át          ejme       øát
SFX B   át          ejte       øát
SFX B   át          ejíc       øát
SFX B   át          ejíce      øát
SFX B   out         uji        [^m]out
SFX B   out         uje¹       [^m]out
SFX B   out         uje        [^m]out
SFX B   out         ujeme      [^m]out
SFX B   out         ujete      [^m]out
