lib/dict/cs_CZ.dic
blít/BN
cupu/BN
ději/BN
dobít/BN
dobudu/BN
dodupu/BN
dohrát/BTN
dohudu/BN
dojdu/BN
dojmu/BN
dokáľi/BN
doklubu/BN
dokovu/BN
dolľu/BN
domýt/BTN
dooději/BN
doodepíąi/BN
doohřát/BON
dopíąi/BN
dopít/BN
doplout/BN
dorostu/BN
dorýt/BTN
dosát/BON
doseji/BN
dospat/BTN
dostat/BN
dostojím/BN
doąít/BTN
dotát/BTN
dotepu/BN
dotřesu/BN
doučím/BN
dout/BN
dováľi/BN
dovít/BN
dovýt/BN
doľenu/BN
doľnu/BN
hnít/BN
hřát/BN
chce/BN
jdu/BN
jmu/BN
kát/BN
kleji/BN
klubu/BN
kout/BTN
krýt/BTN
lít/BN
lľu/BN
melu/BN
nabít/BN
nabudu/BN
nadejdu/BN
nadepíąi/BN
nadeľenu/BN
nadout/BTN
nahnít/BN
nahřát/BON
najedu/BN
nakapu/BN
nakouąu/BN
nalľu/BN
napasu/BN
napíąu/BN
napleji/BN
narostu/BN
nařeknu/BN
naseji/BN
naspat/BTN
nastelu/BN
nastůňu/BN
naąkubu/BN
navát/BON
navedu/BN
naľenu/BN
nýt/BN
obejdu/BN
obelľu/BN
obestelu/BN
obeľenu/BN
objedu/BN
obkovu/BN
obmýt/BTN
obrostu/BN
obstojím/BN
obváľi/BN
odbít/BN
oddupu/BN
odejdu/BN
oději/BN
oděju/BN
odepíąi/BN
odeplout/BN
odestelu/BN
odeąlu/BN
odeľenu/BN
odkapu/BN
odkouąu/BN
odlít/BN
odplout/BN
odřeknu/BN
odstojím/BN
odtát/BTN
odupu/BN
odváľi/BN
odvlát/BN
odľít/BTN
ohřát/BON
okapu/BN
okouąu/BN
omelu/BN
opíąi/BN
opít/BN
oąít/BN
otáľi/BN
oudím/BN
ováľi/BN
ozebu/BN
oľít/BN
pět/B
píąu/BN
pleji/BN
plovu/BN
pobít/BN
poblít/BN
podbít/BN
poději/BN
podemelu/BN
podepíąu/BN
podestelu/BN
podjedu/BN
podplout/BTN
podřeknu/BN
podąít/BTN
podváľi/BN
pohrát/BTN
pojedu/BN
pokapu/BN
pokrýt/BTN
poletím/BN
polít/BN
pomelu/BN
ponesu/BN
poodjedu/BN
pookřát/BN
popíąi/BN
popít/BN
popojdu/BN
poporostu/BN
popoľenu/BN
porostu/BN
poseču/BN
posmát/BN
postěhuji/BN
postojím/BN
poąít/BTN
potáľi/BN
potřesu/BN
poudím/BN
pousmát/BN
pováľi/BN
povezu/BN
povstat/BN
pozbudu/BN
poľít/BTN
probít/BN
procupu/BN
prohnít/BN
prohřát/BON
projdu/BN
projmu/BN
prokáľi/BN
proklubu/BN
prokovu/BN
prolít/BN
promýt/BTN
propasu/BN
propíąu/BN
propleji/BN
prorostu/BN
prořeknu/BN
proslout/BN
prospat/BTN
prostojím/BN
proąít/BTN
protřesu/BN
proudím/BN
prováľi/BN
provýt/BN
proľít/BTN
přebít/BN
předehřát/BON
předejmu/BN
předepíąi/BN
předeąlu/BN
předjedu/BN
předąít/BTN
předváľi/BN
přehrát/BTN
přejdu/BN
přejmu/BN
překouąu/BN
překovu/BN
přelít/BN
přemelu/BN
přepíąu/BN
přeplout/BTN
přerostu/BN
přeřeknu/BN
přeseji/BN
přestat/BN
přestojím/BN
přetnu/BN
převát/BON
převedu/BN
přezout/BTN
přeľenu/BN
přibít/BN
přidupu/BN
přihřát/BON
přijmu/BN
přikáľi/BN
přikrýt/BTN
přimět/BN
přioděju/BN
připíąu/BN
připlout/BN
přiřeknu/BN
přiseču/BN
přispět/BN
přistelu/BN
přivát/BON
přivedu/BN
přizabít/BN
rostu/BN
rozcupu/BN
rozehrát/BTN
rozechvět/BTN
rozemelu/BN
rozepíąu/BN
rozesmát/BN
rozestelu/BN
rozeąlu/BN
rozevlát/BN
rozeľnu/BN
rozkapu/BN
rozklovu/BN
rozkout/BTN
rozkrýt/BTN
rozmýt/BTN
rozrostu/BN
rozseču/BN
rozstůňu/BN
roząkubu/BN
roztepu/BN
rozvedu/BN
rozvrľu/BN
rubu/BN
řeknu/BN
sbít/BN
sehrát/BTN
seji/BN
selľu/BN
sepíąi/BN
sepsout/BTN
sesout/BTN
seąlu/BN
setřesu/BN
seľnu/BN
schnu/BN
skapu/BN
skvět/BJN
slout/BN
smýt/BTN
spasu/BN
spět/BN
splout/BTN
spoluľít/BN
sřeknu/BN
stojím/BN
stůňu/BN
sváľi/BN
sľít/BTN
ąkubu/BN
táľi/BN
tnu/BN
týt/BN
ubudu/BN
udát/BN
udupu/BN
uhrát/BTN
ujdu/BN
ujmu/BN
ukáľi/BN
ukouąu/BN
ukovu/BN
ulít/BN
umýt/BTN
upíąu/BN
uplout/BN
usmát/BN
uspět/BN
ustelu/BN
uąít/BTN
utřesu/BN
uvedu/BN
uvít/BN
uľenu/BN
vát/BON
vbít/BN
vedu/BN
vepíąi/BN
veplout/BN
vevát/BON
vidím/BN
vjedu/BN
vlát/BN
vpít/BN
vrostu/BN
vrľu/BN
vstanu/BN
vybít/BN
vybudu/BN
vydout/BTN
vyhnít/BN
vyhřát/BON
vyjedu/BN
vykapu/BN
vyklubu/BN
vykout/BTN
vykrýt/BTN
vylľu/BN
vymýt/BTN
vynasmát/BN
vypět/B
vypíąu/BN
vypleji/BN
vyrostu/BN
vyrýt/BTN
vysát/BON
vyseji/BN
vyspat/BTN
vystelu/BN
vystůňu/BN
vyąkubu/BN
vytát/BTN
vytepu/BN
vytřesu/BN
vyvát/BON
vyvedu/BN
vyzout/BTN
vyľenu/BN
vyľnu/BN
vzejdu/BN
vzkáľi/BN
vľenu/BN
zabít/BN
zadupu/BN
zahrát/BTN
zahudu/BN
zachvět/BN
zajedu/BN
zakapu/BN
zakleji/BN
zalít/BN
zamelu/BN
zapět/B
zapíąu/BN
zaplout/BN
zarostu/BN
zarýt/BTN
zaseji/BN
zasmát/BN
zaspat/BTN
zastelu/BN
zaąít/BTN
zaąlu/BN
zatřesu/BN
zavát/BON
zavedu/BN
zavlát/BN
zavýt/BN
zaľenu/BN
zaľnu/BN
zdát/BN
zet/BN
zmatu/BN
zpít/BN
zřeknu/BN
ľít/BTN
